California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(d) Each county which operates an early fraud prevention and detection program shall be subject to all of the following conditions: 

(1) No intimidation of applicants or recipients shall occur, either by referral or threat of referral for a fraud investigation.

(2) Applicants shall not be referred for a fraud investigation until after they have completed and signed the application for aid. 

(3) The referral and investigation shall not delay the receipt of aid, including immediate need payments, for eligible applicants and recipients. 

(4) Uniformed investigators shall not be used by any county welfare department for its fraud prevention program. 

(5) The county welfare department shall abide by the confidentiality requirements in Section 10850 and the requirements and protections in the California Right to Financial Privacy Act under Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 7460) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. 

(6) The county shall make a referral for welfare fraud investigation when there is reason to believe that a person, on behalf of himself or herself or others, has done any of the following: 

(A) Knowingly, and with intent to deceive or defraud, made a false statement or representation to obtain benefits, to obtain a continuance or increase of benefits, or to avoid a reduction of benefits. 

(B) Knowingly, and with intent to defraud, failed to disclose a fact which, if disclosed, could result in a denial, reduction, or discontinuance of benefits. 

(C) Accepted benefits knowing he or she was not entitled to those benefits, or accepted any amount of benefits knowing the amount of benefits received was greater than the amount to which he or she was entitled. 

(D) Made any statement which he or she did not know to be true with reckless disregard of the truth, for the purpose of obtaining, continuing, or avoiding a reduction or denial of benefits. 

(7) The county shall make a referral for fraud investigation when there are reasonable grounds to believe that fraud, as specified in paragraph (6), exists. Reasonable grounds exist when one or more of the following criteria exists: 

(A) An overpayment or overissuance of benefits, or both, may result from an applicant’s failure to report information pertinent to eligibility or benefits. 

(B) A questionable situation exists and the applicant or third party acting on behalf of the applicant will not cooperate in providing necessary verification of information which would affect the applicant’s eligibility or the amount of benefits for which the applicant is eligible.

(C) The county welfare program staff person finds conflicting information which could affect the applicant’s eligibility or the amount of benefits for which the applicant is eligible, and any further action on the part of that staff person could jeopardize the investigator’s ability to investigate. 

(D) The county is made aware of any situation involving the applicant that could involve embezzlement, collusion, conspiracy, trafficking, black marketing, or any other general program violations. 

(E) The county is made aware of any situation in which the applicant may have forged, may have caused the forgery of, or is using a forgery of, any warrant or authorization to participate which has been negotiated. 

(F) The county welfare program staff person has received an allegation of fraud with respect to the applicant from any governmental agency. 

(G) The county has received a complaint containing facts which allege that a crime involving a public social services program, including, but not limited to, fraud, perjury, trafficking, or embezzlement, may occur.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 97, Sec. 1.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

11056.

(a) If the applicant is determined to be eligible, aid shall be granted from the date of application if the applicant meets all eligibility conditions on that date, or from the date on which the applicant meets all eligibility conditions, whichever is later. In any event, the beginning date of aid shall comply with federal requirements for aid programs covered under this section whether or not federal financial participation in the aid payment is available.

(b) This section shall include, but not be limited to, payments made under the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care program.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1285, Sec. 2.   Operative November 30, 1990, pursuant to Sec. 9 of Ch. 1285.   Note: The repealed previous version was as amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 578.)
-------------------------------------------

11057.

Any recipient who becomes ineligible for aid under the public assistance program under which he is receiving aid, but appears to be eligible for aid under another public assistance program, shall be so informed, and his application for aid under that other program taken promptly, so that there is no interruption in warrant payments to the recipient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11057.5.

The State Department of Social Services, after consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association, shall determine the times and methods for providing information regarding the At Risk Child Care Program established pursuant to Article 15.5 (commencing with Section 8350) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of the Education Code to potentially eligible former Transitional Child Care recipients (Article 8 (commencing with Section 11500) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), and former aid to families with dependent children recipients.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1190, Sec. 14.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

11061.

The board of supervisors of each county shall file with the department a record of the action of such county in granting or refusing to grant aid to the potentially self-supporting blind to each applicant for such aid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

11062.

The sworn statements, affidavits or affirmations of each applicant or recipient of aid under Chapter 5 of this part, shall be presumed to be true, except with respect to degree of blindness. This section shall not be interpreted to preclude a full and complete investigation by the agency administering aid to the blind.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

11063.

The provisions of this article do not apply to recipients under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of this part, unless otherwise expressly indicated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Residence [11100. - 11105.]

11100.

(a) For the purposes of the provisions of this code relating to public assistance, the continued absence of a recipient of public assistance from the state for a period of 60 days or longer shall be prima facie evidence of the intent of the recipient to have changed his or her residence to a place outside the state. The county granting the public assistance shall make inquiry from all recipients who have been continuously absent from the state for a period of 30 days, with the next assistance payment, to determine their intent to remain residents of California or to become residents of another state, and shall redetermine the residence of those persons. When the inquiry made under this section establishes
 that the recipient is no longer a resident of the state, his or her aid shall be terminated immediately.

(b) If a recipient is prevented by illness, displacement due to a disaster declared by the Governor or the President of the United States, or other good cause from returning to the state at the end of 60 days, and has not by act or intent established residence elsewhere, residence shall not be deemed to have been lost in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 501, Sec. 3.   (AB 607)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11100.1.

(a) For purposes of the In-Home Supportive Services program established pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3, “good cause,” as defined in Section 11100, shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Outpatient medical treatment necessary to maintain the recipient’s health where the medical treatment is not available in California.

(2) Short-term schooling or training necessary for the recipient to obtain self-sufficiency where training which would achieve that objective is not available or accessible in California.

(3) Court-issued subpoena or summons.

(b) The director shall promulgate regulations for the application of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 777, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11100.5.

Notwithstanding Section 11100.1, or any other provision of law, in-home supportive services provided pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 shall be suspended for any recipient who leaves the state and remains absent from the state for a period which exceeds six months. In-home supportive services shall not be resumed until the recipient, upon returning to the state, requests a reassessment of need from the county welfare department, and the reassessment has been completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 777, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11101.

When a recipient of public assistance is absent from the United States for a period in excess of 30 days, his aid shall thereafter be suspended whenever need cannot be determined for the ensuing period of his absence from the United States. No person shall be considered absent from the United States in accordance with this section if he is residing in any of the states, territories, possessions or other districts eligible to receive grants-in-aid from the federal government under the Social Security Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11102.

(a) County residence is not a qualification for aid under any public assistance program.

(b) County responsibility for making aid payments is determined as follows:

(1) The county where the applicant lives shall accept the application and shall be responsible for paying the aid.

(2) Responsibility for payment of aid to a person qualifying for and receiving aid from a county, who moves to another county in this state to make his or her home, shall be transferred to the second county as soon as administratively possible pursuant to the requirements set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 10003.

(c) For purposes of public assistance, the county where an applicant or recipient lives is determined as follows:

(1) For a patient in a state hospital or institution, voluntary, nonprofit, or proprietary facility, or other public or private institution, the county where he or she was admitted.

(2) For a person who has had to leave the county where he or she normally lives, solely for the purpose of securing care not otherwise available to him or her in a medical facility, the county where he or she last maintained a living arrangement outside a medical facility.

(d) This section shall become operative on June 1, 2017.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 801, Sec. 6.   (SB 1339)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative June 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11104.

People who are not citizens or nationals of the United States shall be eligible for aid only to the extent permitted by federal law.

A person who is not a citizen or national of the United States shall only be eligible for aid if the person has been lawfully admitted for permanent residence, or is otherwise permanently residing in the United States under color of law. No aid shall be paid unless evidence as to eligible immigration status is presented.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 66.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11104.1.

The State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services shall not take any compliance, disallowance, penalty, or other regulatory action against a county, as long as the United States Department of Health and Human Services has not taken any compliance, disallowance, penalty, or other action against the state, with respect to any error in the county’s determination to make an individual eligible for benefits under the Aid to Families with Dependent Children, CalFresh, and Medi-Cal programs based on citizenship or immigration status, under any of the following circumstances:

(a) The county has determined the eligibility based on a verification of satisfactory immigration
 status by the Immigration and Naturalization Service.

(b) The county was required by federal law to provide the applicant or recipient a reasonable opportunity to submit documentation.

(c) The county was required by federal law to wait for the response of the Immigration and Naturalization Service to the county’s request for official verification of the immigration status of the individual.

(d) A fair hearing process was required pursuant to federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 41.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.

(a) No person shall be granted aid under this part unless he or she is a resident of the state.

(b) If a recipient of aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) receives an aid payment at an address outside of the state for two consecutive months, the recipient’s eligibility shall be terminated if the county has inquired with the recipient pursuant to Section 11100, and the recipient has not responded to this inquiry by clearly showing that he or she has (1) not established residence elsewhere and (2) been prevented by illness, displacement due to a disaster declared by the Governor or the President of the United States, or other good cause
 from returning to the state.

(c) If a recipient whose aid is terminated pursuant to subdivision (b) reapplies for aid, payments shall be restored if all other eligibility criteria are met and if the recipient can prove both of the following:

(1) His or her permanent residence is in the state.

(2) He or she has not established residence in any other state, which can be considered to be of a permanent nature.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care payments to children placed out of state by California children’s placement agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 501, Sec. 4.   (AB 607)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Property Qualifications [11150. - 11160.]

11150.

It is the intent of this article to set forth the amount of personal or real property, or both, which an applicant for, or recipient of, public assistance may retain and remain eligible to receive public assistance provided he meets the other eligibility requirements for the category of public assistance for which he or she is an applicant or recipient.

In the formulation of any regulations pursuant to this article and in the administration thereof, consideration shall be given to the ability and circumstances of the applicant or recipient in order that undue hardship is not imposed upon
 any applicant or recipient in making plans to comply with the provisions of this article. No applicant or recipient shall be considered ineligible for retaining property where disposition would alter or impair reasonable access to, or the normal use of, his or her home.

This article does not apply to aid to families with dependent children or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of this part, unless otherwise expressly indicated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 328, Sec. 3.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

11151.

An applicant or recipient shall be ineligible to receive public assistance unless the property he owns is held for the following purposes:

1. The property is used to provide the applicant or recipient with a home and conforms to the provisions of Section 11152 of this code.

2. The property is producing income for the support of the applicant or recipient and conforms to the provisions of Section 11153.7 of this code.

3. The property is held as a reserve to meet a contingent need, not
 included within the standard of assistance for which an aid payment is made, and conforms to the provisions of Section 11154 of this code.

4. The property is personal in nature, or meets a special need of the applicant or recipient, or is part of a self-care or rehabilitation plan, or is not available for expenditure or disposition by the applicant or recipient and conforms to provisions of Section 11155 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

11152.

An applicant or recipient may retain personal or real property owned by him, or in combination with any other person, without reference to its value, if it serves to provide the applicant or recipient with a home. The basic home may be a multiple-dwelling unit if the units not occupied by the applicant or recipient are producing income for the support of the applicant or recipient consistent with their rental value.

Any applicant or recipient who does not own a suitable home may apply other real property or the proceeds received therefrom for the acquisition of a home. Such property in whatever form held shall be considered to be used
 as a home during such time as the following conditions apply:

1. A plan has been made which will provide that the property will be used through conversion or transfer within six months for the purpose of providing a home.

2. Any proceeds received from the sale are used within one year of the date of conversion or application for aid, whichever is later, for the purchase of a home, or for the costs of moving, necessary furnishings, or necessary repairs or alterations to the home, except that an amount may be set aside within the limits permitted by Section 11154 of this code.

3. Proceeds of conversion which are received in a form not readily applicable to the initial payment on purchase of the home are retained, and all payments thereafter received on such proceeds are applied to the balance due on the home, or for
 the costs of moving, necessary furnishings, or necessary repairs or alterations to the home.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11153.7.

(a) In addition to real property permitted by other provisions of this part, real property owned by the applicant or recipient, or in combination with his spouse, may be retained in an amount not to exceed a market value, less the amount of any encumbrance of record, of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), provided it is being adequately utilized or is producing income reasonably consistent with its value which is used for the support of the applicant or recipient.

(b) If the real property is not producing income reasonably consistent with its value, the applicant or recipient shall be
 allowed reasonable time to rent, lease or sell the property. If the property cannot be rented, leased or sold on the basis of the market value, the applicant or recipient shall be allowed to submit evidence from a qualified real estate appraiser which indicates the value for which the property can be adequately utilized.

(c) If the applicant or recipient provides evidence that the only method of adequately utilizing the property is sale, the property shall be considered to be adequately utilized provided it is listed with a licensed real estate broker at the market value or the value determined in accordance with subdivision (b) and the applicant or recipient provides evidence that a bona fide and continuous effort is being made to sell the property.

(d) Any mortgage or note secured by a deed of trust not exceeding a market value of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) that is
 obtained by the applicant or recipient, or in combination with his spouse, through the sale of such real property shall be deemed real property when the income from the same is used to meet the needs of the recipient.

For the purposes of this section, “market value” shall be defined as four times the assessed value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1417.)
-------------------------------------------

11154.

The applicant or recipient may retain as a reserve for future contingencies any combination of personal or real property not to exceed a total value of one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200), or, in case of a married couple both receiving public assistance, two thousand dollars ($2,000). Any real property held as such reserve shall be valued at its net appraised market value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11155.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 11257, in addition to the personal property or resources permitted by other provisions of this part, and to the extent permitted by federal law, an applicant or recipient for aid under this chapter including an applicant or recipient under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) may retain countable resources in an amount equal to the amount permitted under federal law for qualification for the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, administered in California as CalFresh.

(b) The county shall determine the value of exempt personal property other than motor vehicles in conformance with methods established under CalFresh.

(c) (1) (A) The value of each motor vehicle that is not exempt under paragraph (4) shall be the equity value of the vehicle, which shall be the fair market value less encumbrances.

(B) Any motor vehicle with an equity value of nine thousand five hundred dollars ($9,500) or less shall not be attributed to the family’s resource level.

(C) For each motor vehicle with an equity value of more than nine thousand five hundred dollars ($9,500), the equity value that exceeds nine thousand five hundred dollars ($9,500) shall be attributed to the family’s resource level.

(2) The equity threshold described in paragraph (1) of nine thousand five hundred dollars ($9,500) shall be adjusted upward annually by the increase, if any, in the United States Transportation Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by the
 United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.

(3) The county shall determine the fair market value of the vehicle in accordance with a methodology determined by the department. The applicant or recipient shall self-certify the amount of encumbrance, if any.

(4) The entire value of any motor vehicle shall be exempt if any of the following apply:

(A) It is used primarily for income-producing purposes.

(B) It annually produces income that is consistent with its fair market value, even if used on a seasonal basis.

(C) It is necessary for long distance travel, other than daily commuting, that is essential for the employment of a family member.

(D) It is used as the family’s residence.

(E) It is necessary to transport a physically disabled family member, including an excluded disabled family member, regardless of the purpose of the transportation.

(F) It would be exempted under any of subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, but the vehicle is not in use because of temporary unemployment.

(G) It is used to carry fuel for heating or water for home use, when the transported fuel or water is the primary source of fuel or water for the family.

(H) Ownership of the vehicle was transferred through a gift, donation, or family transfer, as defined by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on June 1, 2020, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, as added by Section 34 of the act that added this subdivision, whichever date is later, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 33.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.   Repealed on or after June 1, 2020, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11155.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 11257, in addition to the personal property or resources permitted by other provisions of this part, and to the extent permitted by federal law, an applicant or recipient for aid under this chapter including an applicant or recipient under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) may retain countable resources in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for assistance units that do not include at least one member 60 years of age or older or a disabled member, and in an amount not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for assistance units that include at least one member 60 years of age or older or a disabled member.

(b) Effective January 1, 2021, or the date that automation changes occur, as
 required for implementation, in the Statewide Automated Welfare System, whichever date is later, and annually thereafter, the resources thresholds described in subdivision (a) shall be increased on January 1 of each subsequent year by an amount equal to the increase in the California Necessities Index for the most recent fiscal year.

(c) The county shall determine the value of exempt personal property other than motor vehicles in conformance with methods established under CalFresh.

(d) (1) (A) The value of each motor vehicle that is not exempt under paragraph (4) shall be the equity value of the vehicle, which shall be the fair market value less encumbrances.

(B) Any motor vehicle with an equity value of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or less shall not be attributed
 to the family’s resource level.

(C) For each motor vehicle with an equity value of more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), the equity value that exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall be attributed to the family’s resource level.

(2) The equity threshold described in paragraph (1) of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall be adjusted upward annually, commencing January 1, 2021, or the date that automation changes occur, as required for implementation, in the Statewide Automated Welfare System, whichever date is later, by the increase, if any, in the United States Transportation Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.

(3) The county shall determine the fair market value of the vehicle in accordance with a
 methodology determined by the department. The applicant or recipient shall self-certify the amount of encumbrance, if any.

(4) The entire value of any motor vehicle shall be exempt if any of the following apply:

(A) It is used primarily for income-producing purposes.

(B) It annually produces income that is consistent with its fair market value, even if used on a seasonal basis.

(C) It is necessary for long distance travel, other than daily commuting, that is essential for the employment of a family member.

(D) It is used as the family’s residence.

(E) It is necessary to transport a physically disabled family member, including
 an excluded disabled family member, regardless of the purpose of the transportation.

(F) It would be exempted under any of subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, but the vehicle is not in use because of temporary unemployment.

(G) It is used to carry fuel for heating for home use, when the transported fuel or water is the primary source of fuel or water for the family.

(H) Ownership of the vehicle was transferred through a gift, donation, or family transfer, as defined by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(e) This section shall become operative on June 1, 2020, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is
 later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 34.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.   Section operative on or after June 1, 2020, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11155.2.

(a) In addition to the personal property permitted by this part, recipients of aid under CalWORKs shall be permitted to retain savings and interest thereon for specified purposes. Interest earned from these savings and deposited into a restricted account shall be considered exempt as income for purposes of determining eligibility for aid and grant amounts if the interest is retained in the account. If the interest is not deposited by the financial institution into the account, the interest shall be treated as a nonqualifying withdrawal of
 funds from the account as specified in subdivision (b). This section shall not apply to applicants. Funds may be used by the family for education or job training expenses for the accountholder or his or her dependents, for starting a business, for the purchase of a home, or for costs associated with securing permanent rental housing or to make rent payments to overcome an episode of homelessness. Recipients who wish to retain savings for these purposes shall enter into a written agreement with the county to establish a separate account with a financial institution, with the account to be used solely for the purpose of accumulating funds for later withdrawal for a qualifying expenditure. A qualifying expenditure shall be defined by department regulations and shall be verified by the recipient. The recipient shall agree to provide periodic verification of account activity, as required by department regulations. The agreement shall notify the recipient of the penalty for nonqualifying withdrawal of funds.

(b) Any nonqualifying withdrawal of funds from the account shall result in a calculation of a period of ineligibility for all persons in the assistance unit, to be determined by dividing the balance in the account immediately prior to the withdrawal by the minimum basic standard of adequate care for the members of the assistance unit, as set forth in Section 11452. The resulting whole number shall be the number of months of ineligibility. The period of ineligibility may be reduced when the minimum basic standard of adequate care of the assistance unit, including special needs, increases.

(c) If the California Savings and Asset Project is established pursuant to Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 50897) of Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code, then to the extent permitted by federal law, a recipient shall be eligible to receive matching funds derived from federal
 contributions for the purpose of establishing an individual account in an amount not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) in addition to the amounts specified in subdivision (a) and a fiduciary organization may provide amounts in excess of the first three thousand dollars ($3,000) limitation if contributed solely through private sources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 485, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

11155.3.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to provide counties and recipients of aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) with increased flexibility to determine allowable business expenses and income reporting periods in order to facilitate local microenterprise development, maximize opportunities for a family to become self-sufficient, and reduce unnecessary paperwork
 processing by county staff.

(b) Self-employment net income shall be used in computing the aid grant under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200).

(c) For purposes of determining the self-employment net income for applicants and recipients of aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), applicants and recipients may choose to deduct a standard deduction of 40 percent of gross income or verified actual self-employment expenses to the same extent allowed in CalFresh pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6. Applicants and recipients may change the method of deduction only when a redetermination of eligibility is conducted by the county or every six months, whichever occurs first.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 43.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11155.4.

The principal and interest in an individual development account established in accordance with the federal requirements of Section 604(h) of Title 42 of the United States Code or established by a statewide individual development account program shall be exempt from consideration when determining or redetermining eligibility and the amount of CalWORKs assistance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 622, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

11155.5.

(a) In addition to the personal property permitted by other provisions of this part, a child declared a ward or dependent child of the juvenile court, who is 16 years of age or older, or, a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, who is participating in a transitional independent living case plan pursuant to the federal Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-351), may retain resources consistent with Section 472(a) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 672(a)) as contained in the federal Foster Care Independence Act of 1999 (Public Law 106-169) and the child’s transitional independent living case plan. Any cash savings shall be the child’s own money and shall be
 deposited by the child or on behalf of the child in any bank or savings and loan institution whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation. The cash savings shall be for the child’s use for purposes directly related to the child’s or nonminor dependent’s transitional independent living case plan goals.

(b) The withdrawal of the savings by a child shall require the written approval of the child’s probation officer or social worker and shall be directly related to the goal of emancipation. This written approval is not required for withdrawals by a nonminor dependent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 237, Sec. 1.   (AB 2477)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11155.6.

(a) (1) The principal and interest in a 401(k) plan, 403(b) plan, or 457 plan shall be excluded from consideration as property when determining eligibility and the amount of assistance with respect to an applicant for benefits who is not a recipient of CalWORKs benefits.

(2) The principal and interest in a 401(k) plan, 403(b) plan, IRA, 457 plan, 529 college savings plan, or Coverdell ESA, shall be excluded from consideration as property when redetermining
 eligibility and the amount of assistance for recipients of CalWORKs benefits.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “401(k) plan” means a deferred compensation plan that satisfies the requirements of Section 401(k) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) “403(b) plan” means a qualified annuity plan that satisfies the requirements of Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) “IRA” means an individual retirement account that satisfies the requirements of Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(4) “457 plan” means a deferred compensation plan that satisfies the requirements of Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(5) “529 college savings plan” means a qualified tuition program that satisfies the requirements of Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(6) “Coverdell ESA” means an education savings account that satisfies the requirements of Section 530 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 622, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

11156.

If a recipient purchases with cash an essential item, and such purchase under the rules and regulations of the department would have entitled him to a special need allowance each month to meet monthly installments on such purchase had he paid for the item in monthly installments, the recipient shall be considered to have purchased the item from his personal property holdings, and shall be allowed to place in his savings, each month, without deduction from his grant, an amount of income equivalent to the special need allowance he would have been granted had he paid for the item on a monthly installment basis, if he reports the purchase to the county department within 90 days
 after the date on which it was made. The income placed in his savings shall be considered personal property.

The county department, for good and sufficient reason, may extend the period during which a recipient may report a purchase under this section. The department, in its rules and regulations, shall indicate what constitutes good and sufficient reason for extending that period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11157.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 11008, all lump-sum income received by an applicant or recipient shall be regarded as income in the month received, except nonrecurring lump-sum social insurance payments, which shall include social security income, railroad retirement benefits, veteran’s benefits, workers’ compensation, and disability insurance.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this part, for purposes of this chapter and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), “income” shall be deemed to be the same as applied under the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program on August 21, 1996, except that the following are exempt from consideration as income:

(1) Income that is received too infrequently to be reasonably anticipated, as exempted in federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) regulations.

(2) Income from a college work-study program under Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act or Article 18 (commencing with Section 69950) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code or college work-study program, as established in the annual Budget Act, for individuals receiving aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200).

(3) (A) Except as provided for in subparagraph (B), an award or scholarship provided by a public or private entity to or on behalf of a dependent child based on the child’s academic or extracurricular
 achievement or participation in a scholastic, educational, or extracurricular competition.

(B) For purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), an award or scholarship provided by a public or private entity to or on behalf of a dependent child.

(c) (1) For purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), any income or stipend paid by the United States Census Bureau, a governmental entity, or a nonprofit organization for temporary work related to the decennial census shall not be considered income.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall be retroactive and shall apply to any income or stipend paid by the United States Census Bureau, a governmental entity, or a nonprofit organization for temporary work
 related to the most recent decennial census.
